Hawaii, session 2026, GM1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§141- Aquatic livestock import evaluation and
authorization process; rules. The division of animal industry
may adopt, amend, and repeal rules consistent with applicable
law, to develop a science-based evaluation and authorization
process to import and transport aquatic livestock within the
State. This process shall:
(1) Be based on the biological aquatic risk-based
framework developed and maintained by the department
pursuant to this chapter and chapter 142;
(2) Iriclude_niandatory_pre2arrAy^T^_disea^e_testJui22__®IlL£y
point inspection, and post-arrival monitoring and
inspection; and
2026-2435 SB177 CDl SMA-l.docx
wiiiiiffliiiniioMnMinn

Page 2 177
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(3) Require mandatory quarantine, remediation, or
depopulation of any aquatic animals determined to pose
a biological aquatic risk."
SECTION 2. Section 141-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding three new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Aquatic livestock" means species of domesticated or non­
native fish, crustaceans, and mollusks that are propagated and
raised for food or similar human food production, ecological
restoration, or similar commercial purposes.
"Biocontainment" means the operational methods, procedures,
physical facility features, and containment or safety equipment
or the designs thereof, used for managing infectious or
potentially hazardous materials and animals in an aquatic
livestock facility or environment in which these materials and
animals are potentially handled or maintained. "Biocontainment"
includes measures to prevent the release of infectious animal
species and associated pathogens into the natural environment.
"Biological aquatic risk" means the combination of the
consequences of an event, the probability of an adverse
biological event, and the magnitude of its potential
2026-2435 SB177 GDI SMA-l.docx
IHMIUMUHinm

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
consequences, where biological material constitutes the source
of harm, whether from an escaped aquatic livestock species or
associated pathogens or disease."
SECTION 3. Section 141-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) There is established within the department an
aquaculture program that shall:
(1) Monitor actions taken by industry and by federal,
state, county, and private agencies in activities
relating to aquaculture, and promote and support
worthwhile aquaculture activities;
(2) Serve as an information clearinghouse for aquaculture
activities;
(3) Coordinate development projects to investigate and
solve biological and technical problems involved in
raising selected species with commercial potential;
(4) Actively seek federal funding for aquaculture
activities;
(5) Undertake activities required to develop and expand
the aquaculture industry [•;—a-nd] , which shall include:
2026-2435 SB177 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
iiiiiiiiiinmiiiinMHiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO. S.1
C.D. 1
(A) Developing a biological aquatic risk-based
framework for the evaluation and authorization
process for aquatic livestock that categorizes
aquatic livestock species based on the
probability and consequence of the establishment
of a self-sustaining feral or invasive
population; and
(B) Developing biocontainment standards that
establish minimum physical design and operational
performance requirements for aquatic livestock
facilities; and
(6) Perform other functions and activities that may be
assigned by law."
SECTION 4. Section 161-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§161-6 Division of animal industry. The division of
animal industry of the department of agriculture and biosecurity
shall administer this chapter subject to the supervision of the
board. The board may delegate any of its powers under this
chapter, except the power to make rules and regulations[—] other
than rules pursuant to section 141- , or may direct any of its
2026-2435 SB177 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiimniiH

Page 5 177
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
duties to be performed by any appropriate agents, officers, or
employees of the board.
The board may employ on a full or part-time basis
veterinarians and poultry inspectors, subject to chapter 76, to
carry out a uniform inspection system of poultry or poultry
products throughout the State. All poultry inspectors shall be
under the supervision and control of a veterinarian employed by
the board."
SECTION 5. (a) The division of animal industry shall
develop a biological aquatic risk-based framework for the
evaluation and authorization process to import and transport
aquatic livestock within the State. In developing the
framework, the division of animal industry shall consider:
(1) Relevant standards promulgated or recognized by the
United States Department of Agriculture;
(2) Current aquatic livestock import policies, disease
risks, and industry development issues;
(3) Best practices of the aquaculture industry, including
internationally recognized biosecurity and disease
management protocols; and
2026-2435 SB177 CDl SMA-l.docx
MliniHIIHIMIIIIIillM

Page 6
S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
(4) The protection of indigenous species as defined in
section 195D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and their
habitats.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "biological aquatic
risk" has the same meaning as defined in section 141-51, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2435 SB177 CDl SMA-l.docx 6

177
S.B. NO.
I
Wb
o
Ob
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
--------------
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 177, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
181-26

SB No. 177, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives